District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.25

Fund balance requirements for transition committees.

Any balance in the transition committee fund shall be transferred only to a nonprofit organization within the meaning of section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code , operating in good standing in the District for a minimum of one calendar year before the date of any transfer, or to a constituent-service program pursuant to § 1-1163.38.

History

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 325, 59 DCR 1862
Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-79, § 2(o), 61 DCR 153

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-79 deleted “of Columbia” following “District”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-79: Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-79 provided that the act shall apply upon the latest of: (1) The inclusion of the fiscal effect of the act in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register; or (2) January 31, 2015.

A certification dated February 4, 2015, that the fiscal effect of the Campaign Finance Reform and Transparency Amendment Act of 2013, D.C. Law 20-79, has been included in an approved budget and financial plan was published in the D.C. Register on March 13, 2015 (62 DCR 2988).